Massachusetts, session 194th, S977.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 14 of Chapter 235 of the Acts of 2014 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “authorities” the following:-
“The applicant’s preference list shall be limited to 10 housing authorities.”
of 1